Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.080

Criminal prosecutions.

If as the result of any such investigation, or because of any information received, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, is of the opinion that there is evidence sufficient to charge any person with any crime, he or she may cause such person to be arrested and charged with such offense, and shall furnish to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offense was committed, the names of witnesses and all pertinent and material evidence and testimony within his or her possession relative to the offense.

[ 1995 c 369 s 31; 1986 c 266 s 74; 1985 c 470 s 24; 1947 c 79 s .33.08; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 45.33.08. Formerly RCW 48.48.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.